North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8. Evidence.
Article 2. Grants, Deeds and Wills.

§ 8-6.
Copies certified by Secretary of State or State Archivist.

Copies of the plats and certificates of survey, or their accompanying warrants, and all abstracts of grants, which may be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, or in the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, which copies, upon certification by the Secretary of State as to those records in his office, or the State Archivist as to those records in the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, as true copies, shall be as good evidence, in any court, as the original.

History.

1822, c. 1154, P.R; R.C., c. 44, s. 6; Code, s. 1341; Rev., s. 1596; C.S., s. 1751; 1961, c. 740, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Cross References.

As to certification by clerk of Secretary of State, see

G.S. 8-9

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources” twice.

§ 8-7.
Certified copies of grants and abstracts.

For the purpose of showing title from the State of North Carolina to the grantee or grantees therein named and for the lands therein described, duly certified copies of all grants and of all memoranda and abstracts of grants on record in the office of the Secretary of State, or in the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, given in abstract or in full, and with or without the signature of the Governor and the great seal of the State appearing upon such record, shall be competent evidence in the courts of this State or of the United States or of any territory of the United States, and in the absence of the production of the original grant shall be conclusive evidence of a grant from the State to the grantee or grantees named and for the lands described therein.

History.

1915, c. 249, s. 1; C.S., s. 1752; 1961, c. 740, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Department of Cultural Resources.”

§ 8-8.
Certified copies of grants and abstracts recorded.

Duly certified copies of such grants and of such memoranda and abstracts of grants may be recorded in the county where the lands therein described are situated, and the records thereof in such counties, or certified copies thereof, shall likewise be competent evidence for the purpose of showing title from the State of North Carolina to the grantee or grantees named and for the lands described therein.

History.

1915, c. 249, s. 2; C.S., s. 1753.

Cross References.

As to registration of certified copies of any deeds or writings, and their use in evidence, see

G.S. 47-31

.

§ 8-9.
Copies of grants certified by clerk of Secretary of State validated.

All copies of grants heretofore issued from the office of the Secretary of State, duly certified under the great seal of the State, and to which the name of the Secretary has been written or affixed by the clerk of the said Secretary of State, are hereby ratified and approved and declared to be good and valid copies of the original grants and admissible in evidence in all courts of this State when duly registered in the counties in which the land lies; all such copies heretofore registered in said counties are hereby declared to be lawful and regular in all respects as if the same had been signed by the Secretary of State in person and duly registered.

History.

1901, c. 613; Rev., s. 1597; C.S., s. 1754.

Cross References.

As to copies of destroyed record as evidence generally, see

G.S. 98-1

et seq.

§ 8-10.
Copies of grants in Burke.

Copies of grants issued by the State within the County of Burke prior to the destruction of the records of said county by General Stoneman in the year 1865, shall be admitted in evidence in all actions when the same are duly registered; and when the original grants are lost, destroyed or cannot be found after due search, it shall be presumed that the same were duly registered within the time prescribed by law, as provided upon the face of original grant.

History.

1901, c. 513; Rev., s. 1610; C.S., s. 1755.

§ 8-11.
Copies of grants in Moore.

Copies of grants for land situated in Moore County and the counties of which Moore was a part, entered in a book, and the book being certified under the seal of the Secretary of State, shall have the force and effect of the originals and be evidence in all courts.

History.

1903, c. 214; Rev., s. 1613; C.S., s. 1756.

§ 8-12.
Copies of grants in Onslow.

The copies of grants made by the register of deeds of Onslow County under laws of 1907, chapter 434, of grants, abstracts of grants, and other documents pertaining to titles of land in Onslow County issued prior to the year 1800, and contained in a book called Book of Transcribed Grants Issued Prior to One Thousand Eight Hundred, duly authenticated as prescribed in said Chapter 434 of the laws of 1907, shall be received as evidence in all courts of the State, and certified copies therefrom shall be received as evidence.

History.

1907, c. 434; C.S., s. 1757.

§ 8-13.
Certain deeds dated before 1835 evidence of due execution.

In all actions hereafter instituted in which the title or ownership of any lands situated in North Carolina is at issue or in dispute, any deed or release, or a duly certified copy thereof, in which the people of the State of North Carolina are grantees and bearing date prior to the year 1835 and purporting to have been filed and recorded in the office of the Secretary of State of North Carolina prior to said year and now on file and of record in said office, and executed or purporting to have been executed by any person or persons as the representatives or agents or for or on behalf of any society, tribe, nation or aggregation of persons, whether signed or executed individually or in their representative capacity, and any such deed or release having been authorized to be executed by an act of the General Assembly of North Carolina by the properly authorized agents of such society, tribe, nation or aggregation of persons, shall be prima facie evidence that the person or persons signing or executing any such deed or release were the properly authorized agent or agents of such society, tribe, nation or aggregation of persons. Any recitals or statements of fact in any such deed or release shall be prima facie evidence of the truth thereof in any such actions.

History.

1915, c. 75; C.S., s. 1758.

§ 8-14.
Certified copies of maps of Cherokee lands.

Certified copies by the Secretary of State of the copies, or parts thereof, of the maps of the Cherokee lands and of the Cherokee Country, as provided for and described in Chapter 175 of the laws of 1911, shall have the same force and effect and be entitled to the same force and effect as evidence as certified copies of the whole or parts of the original maps.

History.

1911, c. 175; C.S., s. 1759.

§ 8-15.
Certified copies of certain surveys and maps obtained from the State of Tennessee.

A certified copy of the report of the survey made by the North Carolina commissioners, McDowell, Vance and Matthews, of that portion of the State of Tennessee extending from a point on the Virginia line to a point on the Smoky Mountain west of the Pigeon River, as obtained and filed by the Secretary of State under the provisions of Chapter 162 of the laws of 1913, shall, when certified under the hand and seal of the Secretary of State, be competent evidence in the trial of any action in the courts of the State.

History.

1913, c. 162; C.S., s. 1760.

§ 8-16.
Evidence of title under H.E. McCulloch grants.

In all actions or suits, wherein it may be necessary for either party to prove title, by virtue of a grant or grants made by the king of Great Britain or Earl Granville to Henry McCulloch, or Henry Eustace McCulloch, it shall be sufficient for such party, in the usual manner, to give evidence of the grant or conveyance from the king of Great Britain or Earl Granville to the said Henry McCulloch, or Henry Eustace McCulloch, and the mesne conveyances thereafter, without giving any evidence of the deed or deeds of release, relinquishment or confirmation of Earl Granville to the said Henry McCulloch, or Henry Eustace McCulloch, or the power or powers of attorney by which the conveyances from the said Henry McCulloch, or Henry Eustace McCulloch, purport to have been made.

History.

1819, c. 1021, P.R; R.C., c. 44, s. 1; Code, s. 1336; Rev., s. 1600; C.S., s. 1761.

§ 8-17.
Conveyances or certified copies evidence of title under McCulloch.

In all trials where the title of either plaintiff or defendant shall be derived from Henry Eustace McCulloch, or Henry McCulloch, out of their tracts numbers one and three, it shall not be required of such party to produce, in support of his title, either the original grant from the crown to the proprietors, or a registered copy thereof; but in all such cases the grant or deed executed by such reputed proprietors, or by his or their lawful attorney, or a certified copy thereof, shall be deemed and held sufficient proof of the title of such proprietors, in the same manner as though the original grants were produced in evidence.

History.

1807, c. 724, P.R; R.C., c. 44, s. 2; Code, s. 1337; Rev., s. 1601; C.S., s. 1762.

§ 8-18.
Certified copies of registered instruments evidence.

A copy of the record of any deed, mortgage, power of attorney, or other instrument required or allowed to be registered, duly authenticated by the certificate and official seal of the register of deeds of the county where the original or duly certified copy has been registered, may be given in evidence in any of the courts of the State where the original of such copy would be admitted as evidence, although the party offering the same shall be entitled to the possession of the original, and shall not account for the nonproduction thereof, unless by a rule or order of the court, made upon affidavit suggesting some material variance from the original in such registry or other sufficient grounds, such party shall have been previously required to produce the original, in which case the same shall be produced or its absence duly accounted for according to the course and practice of the court.

History.

1846, c. 68, s. 1; R.C., c. 37, s. 16; Code, s. 1251; 1893, c. 119, s. 2; Rev., s. 1598; C.S., s. 1763.

Cross References.

As to recordation and use in evidence of certified copies generally, see

G.S. 47-31

.

§ 8-19.
Common survey of contiguous tracts evidence.

Whenever any person owns several tracts of land which are contiguous or adjoining, but held under different deeds and different surveys, it may be lawful for any such person to have all such bodies of land included in one common survey by running around the lines of the outer tracts, and thereupon the possession of any part of said land covered by such common survey shall be deemed and held in law as a possession of the whole and every part thereof: Provided, that nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the rights or claims of persons which have already accrued to any part of said land. In all cases where such common surveys are made as directed by this section, the same may be recorded and registered as in cases of deeds, and shall be evidence in like manner.

History.

1869-70, c. 34, ss. 1, 2; Code, s. 1277; Rev., s. 1505; C.S., s. 1764.

§ 8-20.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 288, s. 1.

Cross References.

For present provision concerning use of certified registered copies as evidence, see

G.S. 47-31

.

§ 8-21.
Deeds and records thereof lost, presumed to be in due form.

Whenever it is shown in any judicial proceeding that a deed or conveyance of real estate has been lost or destroyed, and that the same had been registered, and that the register’s book containing the copy has been destroyed by fire or other accident, so that a copy thereof cannot be had, it shall be presumed and held, unless the contents be shown to have been otherwise, that such deed or conveyance transferred an estate in fee simple, if the grantor was entitled to such an estate at the time of conveyance, and that it was made upon sufficient consideration.

History.

1854, c. 17; R.C., c. 44, s. 14; Code, s. 1348; Rev., s. 1602; C.S., s. 1766.

Cross References.

As to burnt and lost records, see

G.S. 98-1

et seq.

§ 8-22.
Local: recitals in tax deeds in Haywood and Henderson.

In all legal controversies touching lands in the Counties of Haywood and Henderson, in which either party shall claim title under any sale for taxes alleged to have been due and laid, in and for the year one thousand seven hundred and ninety-six, or any preceding year, the recital contained in the deed or assurance, made by the sheriff or other officer conveying or assuring the same, of the taxes having been laid and assessed, and of the same having remained due and unpaid, shall be held and taken to be prima facie evidence of the truth of each and every of the matters so recited.

History.

R.C., c. 44, s. 11; Code, s. 1346; Rev., s. 1606, C.S., s. 1767.

§ 8-22.1.
Local: tax deeds in Richmond.

Proof of execution and delivery of a deed recorded before 1971 to a grantee by the sheriff of Richmond County pursuant to sale under execution in a tax foreclosure proceeding brought by Richmond County under

G.S. 105-375

establishes a presumption that all notices required by

G.S. 105-375

and Article 29B of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes were duly given and served, as required by law, to all persons entitled to receive the notices.

History.

1981, c. 517.

§ 8-23.
Local: copies of records from Tyrrell.

Copies of records of the County of Tyrrell between the years one thousand seven hundred and thirty-five and one thousand seven hundred and ninety-nine, when copied in a book and certified to by the clerk of the Superior Court of Tyrrell County as to the records of his office and by the register of deeds as to the records of his office, and deposited in their respective offices in Washington County, shall be treated in all respects as original records and received as evidence in all courts of Washington County.

History.

1903, c. 199; Rev., s. 1612, C.S., s. 1768.

§ 8-24.
Local: records of partition in Duplin.

The transcripts made by the clerk of the Superior Court of Duplin County, in accordance with Chapter three hundred and ninety-five of the laws of one thousand nine hundred and seven, of the reports of committees relating to the partition of real estate on file in his office prior and up to the year one thousand eight hundred and fifty-six, entered and indexed in a book entitled Reports of Committees, A, and the reports of committees beginning with and subsequent to the year one thousand eight hundred and fifty-six, entered and indexed in a book entitled Reports of Committees, B, shall be as competent evidence as are the original reports of the committees.

History.

1907, c. 395, ss. 3, 4; C.S., s. 1769.

§ 8-25.
Local: records of wills in Duplin.

The transcripts made by the clerk of the Superior Court of Duplin County, in accordance with Chapter three hundred and ninety-five of the laws of one thousand nine hundred and seven, of all wills and entries of probate and dates of registration appearing on the same, on file in his office prior and up to the January term of the County Court of Duplin County, one thousand eight hundred and thirty, and entered in a book designated as Records of Wills, A, and duly indexed as provided by law, shall be as competent evidence in any court as are the originals of such wills.

History.

1907, c. 395, ss. 1, 2; C.S., s. 1770.

§ 8-26.
Local: records of deeds and wills in Anson.

The copies of the deeds and deed books and of the wills and will books made in Anson County under the act of March second, one thousand nine hundred and five, shall have the same force and effect as the original deeds and deed books copied and as the original wills and will books copied, and shall take the place of said original deeds and deed books and wills and will books as evidence in all court procedure; and wherever said deed books or will books are ordered or directed to be produced in court by subpoena or other order of court, the copies made under such act shall be produced, unless the court shall specially order the production of the original books, and the copies so produced in court shall have the same validity and effect and be used for the same purposes, with the same effect, as the original books.

History.

1905, c. 663, s. 3; Rev., s. 1615; C.S., s. 1771.

§ 8-27.
Local: records of wills in Brunswick.

Under the provisions of Chapter one hundred and six of the laws of one thousand nine hundred and eight, authorizing and directing that all unrecorded wills, dated prior to January first, one thousand eight hundred and seventy-five, on file in the office of the clerk of the Superior Court of Brunswick County, and which have been duly proved in the form required by law, and bearing the adjudication certificate of the proper officer, shall be recorded in the books of wills in the said office and properly indexed; that all wills recorded in the minutes of the court of pleas and quarter sessions or other books of record in said office shall be transcribed and indexed in the book of wills in said office; and that all wills recorded in the office of the register of deeds of said county shall be properly indexed in the book kept for the purpose in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county; the record of any instrument or certified copy thereof, recorded under the provisions of this Article, shall be admitted in evidence in the trial of any cause, subject to the same rules upon which other wills are admitted.

History.

1908, s. 106; C.S., s. 1772.

§ 8-28.
Copies of wills.

Copies of wills, duly certified by the proper officer, may be given in evidence in any proceeding wherein the contents of the will may be competent evidence.

History.

1784, c. 225, s. 6, P.R; R.C., c. 119, s. 21; Code, s. 2175; Rev., s. 1603; C.S., s. 1773.

Cross References.

As to probate of copy of lost will, see

G.S. 98-4

and 98-5.

§ 8-29.
Copies of wills in Secretary of State’s office.

Copies of wills filed or recorded in the office of the Secretary of State, attested by the Secretary, may be given in evidence in any court, and shall be taken as sufficient proof of the devise of real estate, and are declared good and effectual to pass the estate therein devised: Provided, that no such will may be given in evidence in any court nor taken as sufficient proof of the devise unless a certificate of probate appear thereon.

History.

1852, c. 172; R.C., c. 44, s. 12; 1856-7, c. 22; Code, s. 2181; Rev., s. 1607; C.S., s. 1774.

§ 8-30.
Copies of wills recorded in wrong county.

Whereas, by reason of the uncertainty of the boundary lines of many of the counties of the State, wills have been proved, recorded and registered in the wrong county, whereby titles are insecure; for remedy whereof: The registry or duly certified copy of the record of any will, duly recorded, may be given in evidence in any of the courts of this State.

History.

1858-9, c. 18; Code, s. 2182; Rev., s. 1608; C.S., s. 1775.

§ 8-31.
Copy of will proved and lost before recorded.

When any will which has been proved and ordered to be recorded was destroyed during the war between the states, before it was recorded, a copy of such will, so entitled to be admitted to record, though not certified by any officer, shall, when the court shall be satisfied of the genuineness thereof, be ordered to be recorded, and shall be received in evidence whenever the original or duly certified exemplification would be; and such copies may be proved and admitted to record under the same rules, regulations and restrictions as are prescribed in Chapter 98 entitled Burnt and Lost Records.

History.

1866-7, c. 127; Code, s. 2183; Rev., s. 1609; C.S., s. 1776.

§ 8-32.
Certified copies of deeds and wills from other states.

In cases where inhabitants of other states or territories, by will or deed, devise or convey property situated in this State, and the original will or deed cannot be obtained for registration in the county where the land lies, or where the property shall be in dispute, a copy of said will or deed (after the same has been proved and registered or deposited, agreeable to the laws of the state where the person died or made the same) being properly certified, either according to the act of Congress or by the proper officer of the said state or territory, shall be read as evidence.

History.

1802, c. 623, P.R; R.C., c. 44, s. 9; Code, s. 1344; Rev., s. 1619; C.S., s. 1777.

§ 8-33.
Copies of lost records in Bladen.

The clerk of the Superior Court of Bladen County shall transcribe the judgment docket and index books and the will books in his office, and all other books in said office containing records made since the year one thousand eight hundred and sixty-eight, and the records so transcribed shall have the same force and effect as the original records would have, and shall be received in evidence as the original records and be prima facie evidence of their correctness and of the sufficiency of their probate, though the probates are lost and are not transcribed.

History.

1895, c. 415; 1903, c. 65; Rev., s. 1611; C.S., s. 1778.